North Carolina, session 2025, SB291.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 21 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160A-499.11. Regulation of short-term rentals.
(a) No city may adopt or enforce an ordinance, rule, or regulation that does any of the
following:
(1) Prohibits the use of residential property as a short-term rental.
(2) Prohibits the use of accessory dwelling units as short-term rentals.
(3) Limits the number of nights a property can be rented as a short-term rental.
*S291-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Requires the owner of the short-term rental to occupy the property for any
period of time during a rental to an occupant.
(5) Classifies short-term rentals as a commercial use.
(6) Limits the operation of a short-term rental marketplace.
(b) A city may adopt an ordinance, rule, or regulation that regulates short-term rentals
by:
(1) Requiring a lodging operator to obtain a permit to operate a short-term rental
within the city's corporate limits. The city may revoke the permit if the
short-term rental incurs five health and safety violations within a 12-month
rolling period; provided, however, the city shall, prior to revoking the permit,
give the lodging operator an opportunity to contest the alleged violations and,
if found to exist, an opportunity to remedy the violations. The city may charge
a one-time fee of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each permit
issued and may charge an additional fee of not more than twenty-five dollars
($25.00) to reinstate a permit that has expired or been revoked.
(2) As part of the permitting process authorized under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, limiting the number of occupants allowed to stay in a short-term
rental to two adults per bedroom.
(3) As part of the permitting process authorized under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, requiring the lodging operator, or his or her authorized agent, to
provide a parking plan indicating designated parking to accommodate one
space per bedroom. The violation of a parking restriction is not a health and
safety violation under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) Restricting the location of short-term rentals to areas of the city that have been
zoned for residential use, and requiring that the property remains in
compliance with all applicable residential zoning requirements.
(5) Requiring that short-term rentals comply with all applicable city ordinances
and codes, including building codes and housing codes.
(6) Requiring that all contracts for short-term rentals include a copy of any city
ordinances that regulate noise, waste removal, and parking or, in the
alternative, that the lodging operator conspicuously post in the rental a written
summary of city ordinances that regulate noise, waste removal, and parking.
(7) Prohibiting the use of short-term rentals for any purpose other than that which
is allowed in hotels, motels, and inns without the property owner's prior
approval, which shall be evidenced by a written agreement between the
lodging operator and the occupant.
(8) Requiring a lodging operator or authorized agent of a lodging operator be
within a 50-mile radius of a short-term rental during the time that an occupant
is staying in a short-term rental.
(c) Unless the context indicates otherwise, the following definitions shall apply in this
section:
(1) Lodging operator. – A person who rents a short-term rental to an occupant
using a short-term rental marketplace.
(2) Short-term rental. – All of the following that are offered to the public for a fee
and for a period of 90 days or less: (i) an individually or collectively owned
single-family house or dwelling unit, (ii) a unit in a condominium, timeshare,
townhome, or accessory dwelling unit, and (iii) an owner-occupied residential
home. The term does not include any of the following:
a. A collective group of units in a complex of condominiums owned by
a single owner, corporation, or related owner that is non-owner
occupied and is used in a similar manner as a hotel, motel, or an
Page 2 Senate Bill 291-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
extended stay inn if the complex of condominiums is not required to
adhere to the same building standards and regulations as hotels,
motels, and extended stay inns.
b. A unit that is used for a retail business or as a restaurant, banquet space,
event center, or a similar purpose.
(3) Short-term rental marketplace. – A platform through which a lodging
operator, or the lodging operator's authorized agent, offers a short-term rental
to an occupant."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 291-First Edition Page 3